North Carolina statutes. Chapter 55A. North Carolina Nonprofit Corporation Act.
Article 5. Office and Agent.

§ 55A-5-01.
Registered office and registered agent.

Each corporation must maintain a registered office and registered agent as required by Article 4 of Chapter 55D of the General Statutes and is subject to service on the Secretary of State under that Article.

History.

1955, c. 1230; 1957, c. 979, s. 20; 1993, c. 398, s. 1; 1995, c. 400, s. 1; 2000-140, s. 101(d); 2001-358, s. 48(a); 2001-387, s. 173; 2001-413, s. 6.

§ 55A-5-02.
[Repealed]

Repealed by Session Laws 2001-358, s. 48, effective January 1, 2002.

§ 55A-5-02.1.
[Transferred]

Transferred to

G.S. 55A-16-23

by Session Laws 2001-358, s. 48(d).

§§ 55A-5-03 through 55A-5-04.
[Repealed]

Repealed by Session Laws 2001-358, s. 48(c), effective January 1, 2002.

Cross References.

For provisions similar to former G.S. 55A-5-03, regarding resignation of registered agents, see

G.S. 55D-32

.

For provisions similar to former G.S. 55A-5-04, regarding service of process on entities, see

G.S. 55D-33

.